Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.032

Exemptions—Registered nurses and nurse midwives.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Registered nurses and nurse midwives certified by the *nursing care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW shall be exempt from the requirements and provisions of this chapter.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 704; 1981 c 53 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.